text_files/mi_NZ.dic
pupuhi/15,19,71
pupuke/15,19,72
pupuri/5,19,20,73
pupuru/19,20,74
rama/6,15,75
ranga/15,19,20,76
rapa/6,15,16,20,77
rārā/15,78
rarahu/15,19,79
rarama/80
raranga/19,81
rarapa/19,82
rararu/15,83
rarua/84
raruraru/15,19,85
rei/15,19,86
rērere/87
riri/15,19,89
ririu/90
roiroi/1,15,19,20,91
rongo/5,19,20,92
roroku/19,93
roromi/1,15,19,20,94
rorotu/1,95
ruharuha/96
rūnā/19,20,97
rūrū/15,16,19,20,98
tahutahu/14,15,99
taitai/1,15,100
taiwhanga/6,15,19,101
taka/4,6,15,102
takahi/1,19,103
takatakahi/1,104
taki/14,15,105
tapitapi/1,19,106
tara/15,20,107
tarawhai/15,108
tatara/15,109
tatari/19,110
tautara/15,19,20,112
tawetawē/15,19,113
tāwhanga/15,19,20,114
tiki/15,115
titiro/4,116
toheriri/19,117
totohe/15,19,118
tuhituhi/15,119
tui/1,15,120
tungi/19,121
tungu/19,122
tūtara/5,15,19,20,123
tutungi/19,124
uhi/1,15,125
unga/6,19,20,126
utiuti/15,16,127
wawana/19,128
wawao/14,15,19,20,129
wawara/5,16,19,130
whai/15,131
whaiwhai/15,19,20,132
whakahipa/7,15,16,133
whakahīweka/15,19,20,134
whakamana/5,6,15,16,19,20,135
whakanoho/15,16,19,136
whakarere/1,15,19,20,137
whakariri/15,138
whata/5,7,15,139
